Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 2. Board of District Managers

§ 41-6-120.
Number of members; qualifications; succession; quorum; voting procedures.

The board of district managers shall be composed of as many members as there are districts to be represented, and a majority of its members shall constitute a quorum. The commissioner in each district who has longest served the district as such commissioner, shall be the member of the board of district managers from such district. In case of death, resignation, disability or absence of any district manager, the commissioner from his district who is next in seniority of service shall act as district manager in his stead. Where there is no seniority in service among the commissioners of any district, they themselves shall determine the order in which they shall successively serve as members of the board of district managers. If the commissioners of all of the associated districts shall at any time so order, the board of district managers may thereafter be composed of two (2) commissioners from each district, but in such case the vote upon any question before the board shall be by districts, each district being entitled to cast one (1) vote by its representatives or representative present.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 122-1004; C.S. 1945, § 71-1904; W.S. 1957, § 41-235.

Cross references. —

As to irrigation district commissioners, see §§

41-7-301

through

41-7-318

.

As to board of directors of public irrigation and power districts, see §§

41-7-805

through

41-7-812

.

As to drainage district commissioners, see §§

41-9-116

through

41-9-124

.

§ 41-6-121.
President.

The presidency of the board of district managers shall devolve successively upon the representatives of the respective districts, and the order of succession shall be determined in the first instance by lot. The first president shall hold office until the first day of the next succeeding December, and succeeding presidents shall hold office for terms of one (1) year each. In the absence of the president, or in case of his death, resignation or inability to act, his duties shall be discharged by the commissioner from his district who would be entitled to act in his stead, under the provisions of W.S.

41-6-120

. The president shall preside at all meetings of the board. He may vote upon all questions, and, in case of tie, shall also cast the deciding vote. He shall perform such other duties as may be imposed upon him by law, or the order of the board.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 122-1005; C.S. 1945, § 71-1905; W.S. 1957, § 41-236.

§ 41-6-122.
Secretary.

The board of district managers shall appoint a secretary who may or may not be one of their number. Such secretary shall hold his position at the pleasure of the board, and shall perform such duties as may be imposed upon him by law, or order of the board.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 122-1006; C.S. 1945, § 71-1906; W.S. 1957, § 41-237.

§ 41-6-123.
Treasurer.

The board of district managers shall appoint a treasurer for each of the associated districts. The same person may be the treasurer of two (2) or more districts, and may also be secretary of the board. The funds of the associated districts shall not be commingled, however, but shall in all cases be separately kept and accounted for.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 122-1007; C.S. 1945, § 71-1907; W.S. 1957, § 41-238.

§ 41-6-124.
Adoption of name.

At its first meeting, the board of district managers shall adopt a name which shall be formed by prefixing to the phrase “board of district managers”, some word or words different from any used for a like purpose by any other board within the same judicial jurisdiction. A certificate of the adoption of such name shall be filed promptly with the clerk of the court, or clerks, of the courts, having jurisdiction of the several district proceedings.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 122-1008; C.S. 1945, § 71-1908; W.S. 1957, § 41-239.

§ 41-6-125.
Powers generally.

In the operation, maintenance, preservation and repair of the constructed works of the associated districts, and in the assessment, levy, collection and disbursement of district revenues for such purposes, and for the payment of the principal and interest on outstanding indebtedness, the board of district managers shall succeed to and possess all the powers and be charged with all the duties of the commissioners of the several districts which it represents. All other powers of the commissioners of such districts shall be possessed and retained by them, unimpaired, including those relating to uncompleted district works, or such additions to or extensions of such works as require a revision or modification of assessed benefits. Whenever necessary in the discharge of its duties, the board may use the name and corporate seal of any district which it represents, always indicating, however, in some appropriate manner, that the signature and seal have been affixed by the board.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 122-1009; C.S. 1945, § 71-1909; W.S. 1957, § 41-240.

§ 41-6-126.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of the board of district managers so to control and conduct the affairs of the districts under their jurisdiction that each shall bear its just portion of the burdens and receive its just share of the benefits resulting from cooperating management. Accurate and detailed accounts of the amount and cost of labor and material used in the work of each district shall be separately kept, so far as practicable, and whenever labor or material is used for the common benefit of two (2) or more districts, a just apportionment of the cost thereof shall be made between or among the districts benefited, and, in each such case the records of the board shall be made to show clearly the basis of such apportionment.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 122-1010; C.S. 1945, § 71-1910; W.S. 1957, § 41-241.

§ 41-6-127.
Purchase of machinery, tools or equipment.

In the operation and maintenance of the works under its charge, the board of district managers shall, as far as practicable, avoid a duplication of labor and equipment. It shall have no power, however, to purchase machinery, tools or other equipment on account of any district, without written authority from two (2) of the commissioners from such district, and it shall have no power to purchase machinery, tools or other equipment on the joint account of two (2) or more districts, without written authority from two (2) of the commissioners of each of the districts to be charged therewith, which authority shall prescribe the agreed basis upon which the cost of such purchase shall be apportioned between or among such districts. Each district shall be charged with a reasonable rental or hire for the use of property or equipment owned by the associated districts. Such rental or hire shall be uniform to all the districts and shall be so adjusted as to cover, all nearly as can be estimated, repair, interest and replacement costs, and such readjustments shall be made from time to time as may be necessary in order that these costs shall ultimately be borne by the districts in proportion to the use which each has made of such property or equipment.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 11; R.S. 1931, § 122-1011; C.S. 1945, § 71-1911; W.S. 1957, § 41-242.